Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2479XS (8) 91 cm/jh S.F. 364 Section 1. Section 602.1205, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. The district court shall try civil 3 cases in the order in which cases are initiated by the filing 4 of a petition, provided that the following cases shall be 5 entitled to a preference: 6 (1) Actions that have been revived pursuant to section 7 614.1, subsection 12, paragraph âbâ , or section 614.8A, 8 subsection 2. This subparagraph is repealed July 1, 2031. 9 (2) An action in which the interests of justice, as 10 determined by the supreme court, will be served by early trial. 11 b. The supreme court shall prescribe rules to implement this 12 subsection. 13 c. Unless the court otherwise orders, notice of a motion 14 for preference shall be served with the petition by the party 15 serving the petition, or ten days after such service by any 16 other party. 17 Sec. 2. Section 614.1, subsection 12, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 12. Sexual abuse or sexual exploitation by a counselor, 20 therapist, school employee, or adult providing training or 21 instruction. An 22 a. (1) If the victim was eighteen years of age or older, 23 an action for damages for injury suffered as a result of 24 sexual abuse, as defined in section 709.1 , by a counselor, 25 therapist, school employee, or adult providing training or 26 instruction, as defined in section 709.15 , or as a result of 27 sexual exploitation by a counselor, therapist, school employee, 28 or adult providing training or instruction shall be brought 29 within five years of the date the victim was last treated by 30 the counselor or therapist, or within five years of the date 31 the victim was last enrolled in or attended the school. 32 (2) If the victim was a minor, an action for damages for 33 injury suffered as a result of sexual abuse, as defined in 34 section 709.1, by a counselor, therapist, school employee, or 35 -1- LSB 2479XS (8) 91 cm/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 364 adult providing training or instruction, as defined in section 1 709.15, or as a result of sexual exploitation by a counselor, 2 therapist, school employee, or adult providing training or 3 instruction shall be brought within ten years of the date 4 the victim was last treated by the counselor or therapist, 5 within ten years of the date the victim was last enrolled in or 6 attended the school, or within ten years from the attainment of 7 majority, whichever is later. 8 b. (1) Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), 9 every claim or cause of action brought against any party 10 alleging intentional or negligent acts or omissions by a person 11 for physical, psychological, or other injury or condition 12 suffered as a result of conduct which would constitute sexual 13 abuse, as defined in section 709.1, by a counselor, therapist, 14 school employee, or adult providing training or instruction, 15 as defined in section 709.15, or as a result of sexual 16 exploitation by a counselor, therapist, school employee, or 17 adult providing training or instruction, which is barred as of 18 the effective date of this Act because the applicable period of 19 limitation has expired or the plaintiff previously failed to 20 file a petition, is hereby revived, and action thereon may be 21 commenced not later than three years after the effective date 22 of this Act. 23 (2) Dismissal of a previous action, ordered before the 24 effective date of this Act, on grounds that such previous 25 action was time-barred, or for failure of a party to file a 26 petition, shall not be grounds for dismissal of a revival 27 action pursuant to this paragraph. 28 (3) This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2031. 29 Sec. 3. Section 614.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 2. Except as provided in section 614.1, subsection 9 or 32 12, or section 614.8A , the times limited for actions in this 33 chapter , or chapter 216 , 659A , 669 , or 670 , except those 34 brought for penalties and forfeitures, are extended in favor 35 -2- LSB 2479XS (8) 91 cm/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 364 of minors, so that they shall have one year from and after 1 attainment of majority within which to file a complaint 2 pursuant to chapter 216 , to make a claim pursuant to chapter 3 669 , or to otherwise commence an action. 4 Sec. 4. Section 614.8A, Code 2025, is amended by striking 5 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 6 614.8A Commencement of action for minor or child sexual abuse 7 and other sexual offenses. 8 1. Notwithstanding the times limited for actions in this 9 chapter, an action relating to injuries suffered as a result of 10 sexual abuse as defined in section 709.1, and injuries suffered 11 as a result of other sexual offenses including but not limited 12 to lascivious acts with a child in violation of section 709.8, 13 assault with intent to commit sexual abuse in violation of 14 section 709.11, indecent contact with a child in violation of 15 section 709.12, lascivious conduct with a minor in violation 16 of section 709.14, sexual misconduct with a juvenile in 17 violation of section 709.16, subsection 2, child endangerment 18 in violation of section 726.6, or sexual exploitation of a 19 minor in violation of section 728.12, which occurred when the 20 injured party was a minor shall be brought within ten years 21 from the time of discovery by the injured party of both the 22 injury and the causal relationship between the injury and the 23 sexual abuse or other sexual offense, or within ten years from 24 the attainment of majority, whichever is later. 25 2. a. Notwithstanding subsection 1, every claim or cause 26 of action brought against any party alleging intentional 27 or negligent acts or omissions by a person for physical, 28 psychological, or other injury or condition suffered as a 29 result of conduct described in subsection 1, which is barred as 30 of the effective date of this Act because the applicable period 31 of limitation has expired or the plaintiff previously failed to 32 file a petition, is hereby revived, and action thereon may be 33 commenced not later than three years after the effective date 34 of this Act. 35 -3- LSB 2479XS (8) 91 cm/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 364 b. Dismissal of a previous action, ordered before the 1 effective date of this Act, on grounds that such previous 2 action was time-barred, or of failure of a party to file a 3 petition, shall not be grounds for dismissal of a revival 4 action pursuant to this section. 5 c. This subsection is repealed July 1, 2031. 6 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 7 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 8